Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 29 Inmates of State Facilities
12-29-310. Riverside Vocational and Technical School — Cost of implementation and operation.

The cost of implementing and operating the Riverside Vocational and Technical School at facilities of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction as authorized by this section and §§12-29-306 —12-29-309 shall be borne by the state and shall be paid from funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the school, the Division of Correction, and the Division of Community Correction, together with any federal funds that may be available for this purpose in the following manner:

The cost of facilities and equipment in excess of the amount of moneys provided by the school shall be borne by the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction as approved by the Board of Corrections; and

(A)This section and §§12-29-306 —12-29-309 contemplate that the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction will provide facilities for the vocational and technical education programs operated by the school.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 288, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1310; Acts 2005, No. 496, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 802.

12-29-311. Dyslexia screening — Science of reading — Intervention services.

The Superintendent of the Arkansas Correctional School shall:

Promulgate rules that require that:

Teachers within the Arkansas Correctional School have and demonstrate awareness of the best practices of scientific reading instruction as required under the Right to Read Act, § 6-17-429;

Each inmate who does not have a high school diploma or its equivalent receive:

A reading proficiency-level assessment; and

(a)Dyslexia screening administered with fidelity, as defined under § 6-41-602.

If the Arkansas Correctional School provides dyslexia intervention to an inmate who demonstrates under subdivision (1)(B)(ii)(a) of this section that the inmate is reading below the proficiency level required to be a high-functioning reader, the dyslexia intervention the Arkansas Correctional School provides shall be evidence-based and consistent with science-based research specifically tailored to addressing dyslexia; and

A process be established by which new-intake inmates are:

Assessed and administered a dyslexia screening with fidelity, as defined under § 6-41-602; and

Provided dyslexia intervention with fidelity, as defined under § 6-41-602, that is evidence-based and consistent with science-based research specifically tailored to addressing dyslexia; and

Submit a plan to the Division of Correction that allows inmates to voluntarily receive:

A reading proficiency-level assessment;

Dyslexia screening administered with fidelity, as defined under § 6-41-602; and

Reading instruction that is consistent with the science of reading, as provided under the Right to Read Act, § 6-17-429.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 1088, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Individuals undergo a process known as ‘intake’ when entering the Department of Correction system as a new inmate;

“(2)The intake process for new inmates can take at least three (3) to five (5) days, and sometimes longer in certain situations;

“(3)During intake, inmates are given an academic examination amongst other relevant examinations;

“(4)The inmate population of the department is approximately eighteen thousand (18,000);

“(5)The mission of the department is to:

“(A)Protect public safety by carrying out the mandate of the courts;

“(B)Provide a safe and humane environment for all staff members and inmates;

“(C)Strengthen the work ethic of inmates through teaching and instilling good habits; and

“(D)Provide opportunities for staff members and inmates to improve spiritually, mentally, and physically; and

“(6)Part of the mission and vision of the department is to provide correctional services that return inmates to the community as productive people.”

Acts 2019, No. 1088, § 3, provided: “Temporary language.

“(a)The superintendent of the Arkansas Correctional School shall comply with:

“(1)Section 12-29-311(1) by January 1, 2020; and

“(2)Section 12-29-311(2) by October 1, 2020.

“(b)(1)When adopting the initial rules to implement §12-29-311, the final rule shall be filed with the Secretary of State for adoption under §25-15-204(f):

“(A)On or before January 1, 2020; or

“(B)If approval under §10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1, 2020, as soon as practicable after approval under §10-3-309.

“(2)The superintendent of the Arkansas Correctional School shall file the proposed rule with the Legislative Council under §10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2020, so that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval before January 1, 2020.”

Preambles. Acts 1987, No. 777, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, there are currently over 600 inmates in the Arkansas Department of Correction convicted of sex related offenses; and

“Whereas, studies indicate that an unknown proportion of this group have paraphilias (sexual deviations) which, if ignored will result in continued sex related crimes upon release; and

“Whereas, an individualized assessment and treatment program in the Department of Correction to screen for sexually transmitted diseases and teach socially accepted behavior would decrease the amount of recidivism of these inmates;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 46: Mar. 1, 1968. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the penal system of the State of Arkansas is in need of immediate reform, in order better to effectuate the rehabilitation of persons convicted of crime and to make possible their return as useful members of the community, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to establish a Department of Correction to effectuate such rehabilitation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after March 1, 1968.”

Acts 1981, No. 59, § 4: Feb. 12, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present custody classification of prisoners is quite ambiguous and difficult to implement; that this act is necessary to correct such deficiency in the law. It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law which requires physicals to be given twice a year is arbitrary and unnecessary and a waste of taxpayer money; that physicals should be given as often as needed as determined by the medical staff of the Department of Correction as this act requires. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 507, § 4: Mar. 16, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to meet constitutional requirements the Arkansas Department of Correction should be authorized to develop in-house due process procedures for transferring inmates to the State Hospital; that the State Hospital should not be limited in the length of time it can retain custody of the inmates to treat such mental illness; and that this act is immediately necessary to so provide. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 48:

“(a)Sections 11, 12, 13, and 20 of this act are effective on and after September 1, 2015.

“(b)Sections 46 and 47 of this act are effective on and after January 1, 2016.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1088, § 2.

Subchapter 4

— Medical Care

12-29-401. Medical care.

The Department of Correction shall establish and shall prescribe standards for health, medical, mental health, and dental services for each institution, including preventive, diagnostic, and therapeutic measures on both an outpatient and inpatient basis for all types of patients.

An inmate may be taken, when necessary, to a medical facility outside the institution, but the Director of the Department of Correction shall provide ample safeguards for the custody of the inmate while confined in a medical facility outside the institution.

The Board of Corrections is authorized to establish and maintain facilities for health, medical, mental health, and dental services for each institution in the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction, including preventive, diagnostic, and therapeutic measures on both an outpatient and inpatient basis for all types of patients, and to hire physicians and other healthcare professionals.

The board may also implement copay charges for inmate-initiated healthcare requests.

The Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction shall have access to and may obtain copies of all medical records pertaining to any person incarcerated in a facility of either of those departments, including, but not limited to, test results, treatment records, and examination reports generated prior to the commitment of the person to the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction or based on medical care received by the person outside the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction during the period of the person's incarceration, regardless of whether the person consents to the release of the information.

Any entity or person in possession of such records or information has a duty to disclose it to the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction upon written request by the Director of the Department of Correction or his or her designee or the Director of the Department of Community Correction or his or her designee, provided that the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction shall put in place the privacy and security provisions required by federal law and provide assurances of compliance, in writing, to the entity or person to whom the written request is made.

Additionally, the requesting entity or person shall provide assurances in the written request that provisions of state laws which require heightened security and privacy will be complied with.

Any information obtained pursuant to this section shall be used only for treatment purposes, to enable the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction to assign the incarcerated person to the correct unit or to enable the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction to file insurance claims, if applicable.

Any hospital, clinic, medical office, or other such entity and the owners, officers, directors, employees, or agents of such entity, or any other person who, in good faith, furnishes any records or information to the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction pursuant to this subsection shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed in the absence of this subsection.

If an inmate in the Department of Correction or a person in the custody of the Department of Community Correction receives medical services that meet criteria for Medicaid coverage, the departments are authorized to apply for Medicaid coverage under this subsection.

The inmate or person may designate a representative for the purposes of filing a Medicaid application and complying with Medicaid requirements for determining and maintaining eligibility.

However, the agency having custody of the inmate or person shall be the authorized representative for purposes of establishing and maintaining Medicaid eligibility under this subsection if:

The inmate or person does not designate a representative within three (3) business days after request; or

The representative designated under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section does not file a Medicaid application within three (3) business days after appointment and request.

An authorized representative under this subsection:

Shall have access to the information necessary to comply with Medicaid requirements; and

May provide and receive information in connection with establishing and maintaining Medicaid eligibility, including confidential information.

The Director of the Department of Correction or the Director of the Department of Community Correction or his or her designee may access information necessary to determine if a Medicaid application has been filed on behalf of the inmate or person.

Disclosure under subdivision (e)(4)(A) of this section shall be to:

Establish Medicaid eligibility;

Provide healthcare services; or

Pay for healthcare services.

The Department of Human Services shall allow applications for Medicaid coverage and benefits to be submitted up to forty-five (45) days before the release of:

An inmate or offender not previously qualified or previously qualified and subsequently suspended; or

An inmate or offender, eighteen (18) years of age or older, adjudicated as delinquent and not previously qualified or previously qualified and subsequently suspended.

To the extent feasible, the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction shall provide for Medicaid coverage applications to be submitted online to the Department of Human Services.

A sentencing order shall satisfy the identity verification for Medicaid applications, if required for an application, and if permitted by federal law.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement wide-ranging reforms to the criminal justice system in order to address prison overcrowding, promote seamless reentry into society, reduce medical costs incurred by the state and local governments, aid law enforcement agencies in fighting crime and keeping the peace, and to enhance public safety.”

Amendments. The 2013 amendment by No. 462 added (c)(2).

The 2013 amendment by No. 467 added (e).

The 2015 amendment added (e)(5).

Cross References. Correctional facilities, §12-28-101.

ALR.

Provision of Hormone Therapy or Sexual Reassignment Surgery to State Inmates with Gender Identity Disorder (GID). 89 A.L.R.6th 701.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

Cited: Pennington v. State, 260 Ark. 844, 545 S.W.2d 72 (1977).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “division” for “department”.

ALR.

Constitutional Right of Prisoners to Abortion Services and Facilities. 28 A.L.R.6th 485.

All prisoners committed to the Division of Correction shall be given a physical examination initially upon arrival and then as often as determined by medical staff of the division.

Inmates shall be assigned to labor as shall be fitting, with due consideration being given to their physical condition.

(1)Each new inmate committed to the Division of Correction shall be given a medical examination during the intake process.

Restrictions placed upon an inmate's work assignments under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section shall be updated as medically necessary.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendment substituted “inmates” for “convicts” in the section heading.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b) and (c); and made stylistic changes in (b).

The division shall not assign an inmate to a work assignment that conflicts with a restriction determined by the medical provider for the division under subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

Whenever the medical provider updates the restrictions under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the division shall adjust the inmate's work assignments as necessary to comply with the updated restrictions.

As used in this section:

Has a medical condition that is not necessarily terminal but renders him or her permanently and irreversibly incapacitated; and

Requires immediate and long-term care; and

“Terminally ill” means, as determined by a licensed physician, that an inmate:

Has an incurable condition caused by illness or disease; and

Will likely die within two (2) years due to the illness or disease.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 570, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. The intent of this act is to implement comprehensive measures designed to reduce recidivism, hold offenders accountable, and contain correction costs.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote (a); inserted (b) and redesignated former (b) as (c); in (c)(1), added “Upon receipt of a communication described in subsection (b) of this section” at the beginning and substituted “determine whether the inmate is eligible under this section for immediate transfer to parole supervision” for “making a decision”; in (c)(2), inserted “and the board is satisfied that the inmate's physical condition makes the inmate no longer a threat to public safety”, substituted “approve” for “make”, and deleted “eligible” following “inmate”; and added (d) and (e).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”, and substituted “Mental Health Services Section of the Division of Correction” for “Mental Health Services Section of the Division of Health Treatment Services of the Department of Correction”; and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(2).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a); substituted “Mental Health Services Section of the Division of Correction” for “Mental Health Services Section of the Division of Health Treatment Services of the Department of Correction” in (b)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(2).

The Director of the Division of Correction or the Director of the Division of Community Correction shall communicate to the Parole Board when, in the independent opinions of either a Division of Correction physician or Division of Community Correction physician, and a consultant physician in Arkansas, an inmate is either terminally ill or permanently incapacitated and should be considered for transfer to parole supervision.

(1)Upon receipt of a communication described in subsection (b) of this section, the board shall assemble or request all such information as is germane to determine whether the inmate is eligible under this section for immediate transfer to parole supervision.

An inmate is not eligible for parole supervision under this section if he or she is required to register as a sex offender under the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq., and:

The board may revoke a person's parole supervision granted under this section if the person's medical condition improves to the point that he or she would initially not have been eligible for parole supervision under this section.

The Division of Correction is authorized to develop in-house due process procedures as approved by the Board of Corrections in accordance with United States Supreme Court guidelines for the voluntary or involuntary treatment of inmates with mental illness at the facilities and programs of the Mental Health Services Section of the Division of Correction.

(1)While the inmate is in treatment, the inmate's sentence shall continue to run.

The purpose of this section is to enable the Division of Correction to establish a core program that will utilize services of medical and mental health providers in the community to provide intensive treatment of inmates with paraphilia, commonly known as sexual deviations, during their incarceration to increase their chance of returning to society successfully upon their release.

(1)The Mental Health Services Section of the Division of Correction is authorized to establish and maintain a program for intensive treatment for control of deviant sexual behavior of inmates in a specialized treatment setting and to cooperate with the medical services provider in screening for sexually transmitted diseases as part of this program.

The section shall adopt, promulgate, and enforce such rules, policies, and standards as may be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this section.

When an individual who is enrolled in a Medicaid program or the Health Care Independence Program is incarcerated to the custody of the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, or detained in a county jail, city jail, juvenile detention facility, or other Division of Youth Services of the Department of Human Services commitment, the Department of Human Services shall suspend, to the degree feasible, the individual's coverage during the period of incarceration for up to twelve (12) months from the initial approval or renewal, unless prohibited by law.

When an individual with suspended Medicaid eligibility receives eligible medical treatment or is released from custody, the Department of Human Services shall reinstate, to the degree feasible, the individual's coverage for up to twelve (12) months from the initial approval or renewal, unless prohibited by law.

The Department of Human Services shall ensure that the suspension and reinstatement process is automated and that protocols are developed to maximize Medicaid reimbursement for allowable medical services and essential health benefits.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement wide-ranging reforms to the criminal justice system in order to address prison overcrowding, promote seamless reentry into society, reduce medical costs incurred by the state and local governments, aid law enforcement agencies in fighting crime and keeping the peace, and to enhance public safety.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

This subchapter violates the Supremacy Clause of the United States Constitution because it permits the state to attach funds that federal law exempts from legal process. Bennett v. Arkansas, 485 U.S. 395, 108 S. Ct. 1204, 99 L. Ed. 2d 455 (1988).

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-150; Acts 1993, No. 884, § 1; 1995, No. 291, § 1; 2001, No. 161, § 1; 2013, No. 462, § 1; 2013, No. 467, § 1; 2015, No. 895, § 11.

12-29-402. Physical examination — Assignment to labor.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 157, § 3; 1981, No. 59, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-138; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 803.

12-29-403. Inmates with a disability — Duty of physician.

(A)During the medical examination required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the medical provider shall determine what restrictions, if any, shall be placed upon the inmate's work assignments.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 76, § 34, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., § 9665; Pope's Dig., § 12705; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-151; Acts 2009, No. 208, § 1; 2013, No. 295, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 804.

12-29-404. Medical parole for a terminal illness or permanent incapacitation — Definitions.

“Permanently incapacitated” means, as determined by a licensed physician, that an inmate:

If the facts warrant and the board is satisfied that the inmate's physical condition makes the inmate no longer a threat to public safety, the board may approve the inmate for immediate transfer to parole supervision.

The inmate is assessed as a Level 3 offender or higher; or

A victim of one (1) or more of the inmate's sex offenses was fourteen (14) years of age or younger.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 76, § 35, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., § 9666; Pope's Dig., § 12706; A.S.A. 1947 § 46-152; Acts 1991, No. 771, § 1; 1995, No. 290, § 1; 2011, No. 570, § 75; 2019, No. 910, § 805.

12-29-405. Inmates with
mental illness.

If an inmate's sentence expires while in treatment, the division shall release the inmate or pursue involuntary admission under the appropriate procedures prescribed by existing laws governing the involuntary treatment of individuals with mental illness.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 507, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-153.1, 46-153.2; Acts 1993, No. 884, §§ 2, 3;
2019, No. 910, §§ 806, 807.

12-29-406. Treatment for deviant sexual behavior.

The division may develop the program in such a manner as to utilize outside professionals from the medical and mental health fields to provide both teaching and training opportunities.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 777, §§ 1-3; 2019, No. 315, § 902; 2019, No. 910, §
808.

12-29-407. Medicaid suspension.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 12; 2019, No. 910, § 809.

Subchapter 5

— State Prison Inmate Care and Custody Reimbursement Act

12-29-501. Title.

This subchapter may be known and cited as the “State Prison Inmate Care and Custody Reimbursement Act”.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 715, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1701.

12-29-502. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Board” means the Board of Corrections;

“Cost of care” means the cost to the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction for providing room, board, clothing, medical, and other normal living expenses of inmates in the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction, as determined from time to time by the board;

“Director” means the Director of the Department of Correction or the Director of the Department of Community Correction; and

“Estate” means any tangible or intangible properties, real or personal, belonging to or due an inmate confined to an institution of the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction, including income or payments to the inmate from Social Security, previously earned salary or wages, bonuses, annuities, pensions, or retirement benefits, or any source whatsoever.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted “or the Department of Community Correction” following the first occurrence of“Department of Correction" in (2); added "or the Director of the Department of Community Correction" in (3); and substituted “Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction” for “department” in (2) and (4).

The plain language of this section reflects, in defining “estate,” that the state is permitted to recover from an inmate's estate, whatever it might be. Burns v. State, 303 Ark. 64, 793 S.W.2d 779 (1990).

State was entitled to the $5,016.61 in appellant's inmate account under the Arkansas State Prison Inmate Care and Custody Reimbursement Act, §§12-29-501 to12-29-507, for a portion of the cost of housing appellant. The Supreme Court of Arkansas held that any money appellant received as a gift from his mother that was deposited into his inmate account was clearly within the definition of the term “estate” in subdivision (4) of this section.MacKool v. State, 2012 Ark. 287, 423 S.W.3d 28 (2012).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 715, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1702; 2013, No. 289, § 1.

12-29-503. Monthly reports on prisoners — Investigation.

The Director of the Department of Correction or the Director of the Department of Community Correction shall forward to the Attorney General a list containing the name of each prisoner in the respective penal facilities of the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction, the county from which he or she was sentenced, the term of the sentence, the date of admission, together with all information available to the appropriate department on the financial responsibilities of the prisoner.

The report shall be made on forms to be agreed upon by the Director of the Department of Correction and the Attorney General or his or her designated employee and shall be made on or before the tenth day of each month.

The Attorney General shall investigate or cause to be investigated all such reports furnished by the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction for the purpose of securing reimbursement for the expenses of the State of Arkansas for the cost of care of the prisoners.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted “or the Director of the Department of Community Correction”, “or the Department of Community Correction”, and “appropriate”; and substituted “Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction” for “department” in (b).

There is a rational connection between Act 715 of 1981, as codified in this section and §12-29-504, and the nonpunitive goal of reimbursement to the state for care and custody expenses from state prison inmates. Act 715 is not unconstitutional as ex post facto law as it is not focused on the crimes committed by defendant, nor is it additional punishment. Burns v. State, 303 Ark. 64, 793 S.W.2d 779 (1990).

At the time of the hearing, if it appears that the inmate or resident has an estate that is subject to the claim of the state, without further notice the circuit court shall appoint a guardian of the person and estate of the inmate or resident if the circuit court determines a guardian is necessary for the protection of the rights of all parties concerned.

The circuit court shall make an order requiring the guardian or any person or corporation possessing the estate belonging to the inmate or resident to appropriate and apply the estate or part of the estate as appropriate toward reimbursing the state, to the payment of the expenses so far incurred by the state on behalf of the inmate or resident, and a part of the estate toward reimbursing the state for the future expenses that it must pay on the inmate's or resident's behalf.

The reimbursement under subdivision (c)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall not be in excess of the per capita cost of maintaining inmates or residents in the institution or community correction facility in which he or she is an inmate or resident.

However, before issuing any order under this subchapter providing for payments from the estate of the inmate or resident for his or her cost of care while confined to an institution of the Department of Correction or community correction facility of the Department of Community Correction, the circuit court shall take into consideration and make allowances for the maintenance and support of the spouse, dependent children, or other persons having a moral or legal right to support and maintenance out of the estate of the inmate or resident.

The circuit court shall take the factors under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section into consideration in determining the amount to be paid, if any, from the estate of the inmate or resident for his or her cost of care at the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction.

If a guardian, person, or corporation neglects or refuses to comply with the order, the circuit court shall cite the guardian, person, or corporation to appear before the circuit court at a time as it may direct and to show cause why the guardian, person, or corporation should not be sentenced for contempt of court.

As an additional remedy, the Attorney General or prosecuting attorney may enforce payment of the sums provided in the original order by a proper action in the name of the state.

If in the opinion of the court the estate of the inmate or resident is sufficient to pay the cost of the proceedings under this section, the estate shall be made liable for the cost of the proceedings by order of the circuit court.

The proceedings provided for by this section may be begun at any time after admittance of the person to a facility of the Department of Correction as an inmate or to a community correction facility of the Department of Community Correction as a resident.

Recovery may be had for the expenses incurred on behalf of an inmate or resident during the entire period the person is an inmate at a facility of the Department of Correction or a resident of a community correction facility of the Department of Community Correction.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendment substituted “inmate” for “prisoner” throughout the section and rewrote the section to clarify references and conform usage.

There is a rational connection between Act 715 of 1981, as codified in this section and §12-29-503, and the nonpunitive goal of reimbursement to the state for care and custody expenses from state prison inmates. Act 715 is not unconstitutional as ex post facto law as it is not focused on the crimes committed by defendant, nor is it additional punishment. Burns v. State, 303 Ark. 64, 793 S.W.2d 779 (1990).

Cited: MacKool v. State, 2012 Ark. 287, 423 S.W.3d 28 (2012).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 715, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1703; 2013, No. 289, § 2.

12-29-504. Reimbursement proceedings — Appointment of guardian.

(1)When a person is admitted to an institution of the Department of Correction as an inmate or the Department of Community Correction as a resident of a community correction facility, the Attorney General shall petition the Pulaski County Circuit Court or the prosecuting attorney of the county from which the inmate or resident was sentenced shall petition the circuit court of the county from which the person was sentenced if the inmate or resident possesses any estate or becomes possessed of any estate while he or she is in the institution or community correction facility.

The petition shall:

State that the person is an inmate at an institution of the Department of Correction or a resident of a community correction facility of the Department of Community Correction;

State that the Attorney General or prosecuting attorney has good reason to believe and does believe that the inmate or resident has an estate;

Pray for the appointment of a guardian of the person if a guardian has not already been appointed; and

Pray that the estate may be subjected to payment to the state of the expenses paid and to be paid by the state on behalf of the inmate or resident as an inmate or resident.

(1)The circuit court shall then issue a citation to show cause why the prayer of the petitioner should not be granted.

If the inmate or resident has a guardian, the petition shall be served upon the guardian.

If the inmate or resident does not have a guardian, the petition shall be served at least fourteen (14) days before the date of the hearing upon the inmate or resident by delivering a copy personally or by registered mail to the warden or head of the institution where the person is an inmate or, if the person is a resident of a community correction facility of the Department of Community Correction, to the Director of the Department of Community Correction.

The circuit court may appoint a guardian of the person.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 715, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1704; 2013, No. 289, § 3; 2015, No. 1161, § 4.

12-29-505. Duty to furnish information.

It shall be the duty of the sentencing judge, the county sheriff of the county, the Director of the Department of Correction or the Director of the Department of Community Correction, and the warden or administrative head of the penal facility or residential facility in which the person or prisoner is confined to furnish on inquiry to the Attorney General or prosecuting attorney all information and assistance possible to enable the Attorney General or prosecuting attorney to secure reimbursement for the cost of care of the person or prisoner by the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 715, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1705; 2013, No. 289, § 4.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted “or the Director of the Department of Community Correction” and “or residential facility”.